District of Columbia statutes.
28-4553

Excessive pricing in sales of prescription drugs, a violation of law.

It shall be unlawful for any drug manufacturer or licensee thereof, excluding a point of sale retail seller, to sell or supply for sale or impose minimum resale requirements for a patented prescription drug that results in the prescription drug being sold in the District for an excessive price.

Dec. 10, 2005, D.C. Law 16-37, § 2, 52 DCR 9061